Hawaii statutes.
[§124A-84] Execution of confinement.
(a) A sentence of confinement adjudged by a military court, whether or not the
sentence includes discharge or dismissal, and whether or not the discharge or
dismissal has been executed, may be carried into execution by confinement in
any place of confinement under the control of any of the forces of the state
military forces or in any state correctional facility designated for that
purpose. Persons so confined in a state correctional facility are subject to
the same discipline and treatment as persons confined or committed to a state
correctional facility by the courts of the State.

(b) The omission of the words "hard
labor" from any sentence or punishment of a court-martial adjudging
confinement does not deprive the authority executing that sentence or
punishment of the power to require hard labor as a part of the punishment.

(c) The keepers, officers, and wardens of
state correctional facilities designated by the governor, or by such person as
the governor may authorize to act under section 124A-15, shall receive persons
ordered into confinement before trial and persons committed to confinement by a
military court and shall confine them according to law. No such keeper,
officer, or warden may require payment of any fee or charge for so receiving or
confining a person. [L 1982, c 171, pt of §2; gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next